Maryland, session 2025, SB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article II – Executive Department
17.
(a) To guard against hasty or partial legislation and encroachment of the
Legislative Department upon the co–ordinate Executive and Judicial Departments, every
Bill, EXCEPT FOR THE BUDGET BILL, passed by the House of Delegates and the Senate,
before it becomes a law, shall be presented to the Governor of the State. If the Governor
approves the Bill, the Governor shall sign the Bill. [Except for the Budget Bill, if] IF the
Governor disapproves the Bill, the Governor shall return it with objections to the House in
which it originated, which House shall enter the objections at large on its Journal and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1034*

SENATE BILL 1034
proceed to reconsider the Bill. Each House may adopt by rule a veto calendar procedure
that permits Bills that are to be reconsidered to be read and voted upon as a single group.
The members of each House shall be afforded reasonable notice of the Bills to be placed on
each veto calendar. Upon the objection of a member, any Bill shall be removed from the
veto calendar. If, after such reconsideration, three–fifths of the members elected to that
House pass the Bill, it shall be sent with the objections to the other House, by which it shall
likewise be reconsidered, and if it passes by three–fifths of the members elected to that
House it shall become a law. The votes of both Houses shall be determined by yeas and
nays, and the names of the persons voting for and against the Bill shall be entered on the
Journal of each House respectively.
(b) If any Bill presented to the Governor while the General Assembly is in session
is not returned by the Governor with objections within six days (Sundays excepted), the
Bill shall be a law in like manner as if the Governor signed it, unless the General Assembly,
by adjournment, prevents its return, in which case it shall not be a law.
(c) Any Bill presented to the Governor within six days (Sundays excepted), prior
to adjournment of any session of the General Assembly, or after such adjournment, shall
become law without the Governor’s signature unless it is vetoed by the Governor within 30
days after its presentment.
(d) Any Bill[, except the Budget Bill,] vetoed by the Governor shall be returned
to the House in which it originated immediately after the House has organized at the next
regular or special session of the General Assembly[, other than in extraordinary session
convened under subsection (g) of this section]. The Bill may then be reconsidered according
to the procedure specified in this section. Any Bill enacted over the veto of the Governor, or
any Bill which shall become law as the result of the failure of the Governor to act within
the time specified, shall take effect 30 days after the Governor’s veto is over–ridden, or on
the date specified in the Bill, whichever is later. If the Bill is an emergency measure, it
shall take effect when enacted. No such vetoed Bill shall be returned to the Legislature
when a new General Assembly of Maryland has been elected and sworn since the passage
of the vetoed Bill.
(e) [Except for the Budget Bill, the] THE Governor shall have power to
disapprove of any item or items of any Bills making appropriations of money embracing
distinct items, and the part or parts of the Bill approved shall be the law, and the item or
items of appropriations disapproved shall be void unless repassed according to the rules or
limitations prescribed for the passage of other Bills over the Executive veto.
[(f) (1) The Governor may approve or disapprove items in the Budget Bill as
provided in this subsection.
(2) The Governor may veto only items relating to the Executive
Department that have been increased or added by the General Assembly. The Governor
may not veto any other items in the Budget Bill.

SENATE BILL 1034 3
(3) If the Governor vetoes an item that had been increased by the General
Assembly and the General Assembly does not override the veto under subsection (g) of this
section, that item shall revert to the proposed appropriation submitted by the Governor.
The proposed appropriation shall then be law immediately without further action by the
Governor.
(4) If the Governor vetoes an item that had been added by the General
Assembly and the General Assembly does not override the veto under subsection (g) of this
section, that item shall be void.
(5) Items not disapproved by the Governor shall be law immediately
without further action by the Governor.
(g) (1) If the Governor vetoes an item in the Budget Bill, the General Assembly
may convene in extraordinary session within 30 days after the date of the veto to consider
whether to override the veto. If the General Assembly wishes to consider whether to
override the Governor’s veto of an item in the Budget Bill, the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Delegates jointly shall issue a proclamation specifying the date
on which to convene in extraordinary session.
(2) (i) The Budget Bill shall be returned by the Governor to the House
in which it originated, and each vetoed item shall be considered individually.
(ii) If three–fifths of the members elected to that House vote to
override the veto of an item, it shall be sent to the other House for consideration.
(iii) If three–fifths of the members of that House vote to override the
veto of the item, that item shall revert to the appropriation originally passed by the General
Assembly. The appropriation as originally passed shall then become law immediately,
without further action by the Governor or the General Assembly.]
Article III – Legislative Department
14.
The General Assembly shall meet on the second Wednesday of January, nineteen
hundred and seventy–one, and on the same day in every year thereafter, and at no other
time, unless convened [by joint proclamation of the President of the Senate and the Speaker
of the House of Delegates under Section 17(g) of Article II of this Constitution or] by
Proclamation of the Governor. The Governor shall issue a Proclamation convening the
General Assembly in extraordinary session if a majority of the members elected to the
Senate and a majority of the members elected to the House of Delegates join in a petition
to the Governor requesting that the Governor convene the General Assembly in
extraordinary session, and the Governor shall convene the General Assembly on the date
specified in the petition. This section does not affect the Governor’s power to convene the
General Assembly in extraordinary session pursuant to Section 16 of Article II of this
Constitution.

SENATE BILL 1034
52.
(1) The General Assembly shall not appropriate any money out of the Treasury
except in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) Every appropriation bill shall be either a Budget Bill, or a Supplementary
Appropriation Bill, as hereinafter provided.
(3) On the third Wednesday in January in each year, (except in the case of a newly
elected Governor, and then not later than ten days after the convening of the General
Assembly), unless such time shall be extended by the General Assembly, the Governor shall
submit to the General Assembly a Budget for the next ensuing fiscal year. Each Budget
shall contain a complete plan of proposed expenditures and estimated revenues for said
fiscal year and shall show the estimated surplus or deficit of revenues at the end of the
preceding fiscal year. Accompanying each Budget shall be a statement showing: (a) the
revenues and expenditures for the preceding fiscal year; (b) the current assets, liabilities,
reserves and surplus or deficit of the State; (c) the debts and funds of the State; (d) an
estimate of the State’s financial condition as of the beginning and end of the preceding fiscal
year; (e) any explanation the Governor may desire to make as to the important features of
the Budget and any suggestions as to methods for reduction or increase of the State’s
revenue.
(4) Each Budget shall embrace an estimate of all appropriations in such form and
detail as the Governor shall determine or as may be prescribed by law, as follows: (a) for
the General Assembly as certified to the Governor in the manner hereinafter provided; (b)
for the Executive Department; (c) for the Judiciary Department, as provided by law, as
certified to the Governor; (d) to pay and discharge the principal and interest of the debt of
the State in conformity with Section 34 of Article III of the Constitution, and all laws
enacted in pursuance thereof; (e) for the salaries payable by the State and under the
Constitution and laws of the State; (f) for the establishment and maintenance throughout
the State of a thorough and efficient system of public schools in conformity with Article 8
of the Constitution and with the laws of the State; and (g) for such other purposes as are
set forth in the Constitution or laws of the State.
(5) The Governor shall deliver to the presiding officer of each House the Budget
and a bill for all the proposed appropriations of the Budget classified and in such form and
detail as the Governor shall determine or as may be prescribed by law; and the presiding
officer of each House shall promptly cause said bill to be introduced therein, and such bill
shall be known as the “Budget Bill.” The Governor may, with the consent of the General
Assembly, before final action thereon by the General Assembly, amend or supplement said
Budget to correct an oversight, provide funds contingent on passage of pending legislation
or, in case of an emergency, by delivering such an amendment or supplement to the
presiding officers of both Houses; and such amendment or supplement shall thereby become
a part of said Budget Bill as an addition to the items of said bill or as a modification of or a
substitute for any item of said bill such amendment or supplement may affect.

SENATE BILL 1034 5
(5a) The Budget and the Budget Bill as submitted by the Governor to the General
Assembly shall have a figure for the total of all proposed appropriations and a figure for
the total of all estimated revenues available to pay the appropriations, and the figure for
total proposed appropriations shall not exceed the figure for total estimated revenues.
Neither the Governor in submitting an amendment or supplement to the Budget Bill nor
the General Assembly in amending the Budget Bill shall thereby cause the figure for total
proposed appropriations to exceed the figure for total estimated revenues, including any
revisions, and in the Budget Bill as enacted the figure for total estimated revenues always
shall be equal to or exceed the figure for total appropriations.
(6) The General Assembly shall not amend the Budget Bill so as to affect either
the obligations of the State under Section 34 of Article III of the Constitution, or the
provisions made by the laws of the State for the establishment and maintenance of a system
of public schools or the payment of any salaries required to be paid by the State of Maryland
by the Constitution THEREOF; AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY AMEND THE BILL
BY INCREASING OR DIMINISHING THE ITEMS THEREIN RELATING TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, AND BY INCREASING OR DIMINISHING THE ITEMS THEREIN RELATING
TO THE JUDICIARY, BUT EXCEPT AS HEREINBEFORE SPECIFIED, MAY NOT ALTER
THE SAID BILL EXCEPT TO STRIKE OUT OR REDUCE ITEMS THEREIN, PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, THAT THE SALARY OR COMPENSATION OF ANY PUBLIC OFFICER SHALL
NOT BE DECREASED DURING THE PUBLIC OFFICER’S TERM OF OFFICE; AND SUCH
BILL, WHEN AND AS PASSED BY BOTH HOUSES, SHALL BE A LAW IMMEDIATELY
WITHOUT FURTHER ACTION BY THE GOVERNOR.
[(6a) In enacting a balanced Budget Bill each fiscal year as required under this
Section, the General Assembly may amend the bill by increasing or diminishing the items
therein relating to the General Assembly, and by increasing or diminishing the items
therein relating to the judiciary, but except as hereinbefore specified, may not alter the bill
except to strike out or reduce items therein, provided, however, that the salary or
compensation of any public officer may not be decreased during the public officer’s term of
office. When passed by both Houses, the Budget Bill shall be presented to the Governor for
approval or disapproval according to Section 17 of Article II of this Constitution.
(6b) In enacting a balanced Budget Bill as required under this Section for fiscal
year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, the General Assembly may amend the bill by
increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the General Assembly, by
increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the judiciary, and by
increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the Executive Department,
provided that the total of the appropriation for the Executive Department approved by the
General Assembly does not exceed the total proposed appropriation for the Executive
Department submitted by the Governor. The salary or compensation of any public officer
may not be decreased during the public officer’s term of office. When passed by both Houses,
the Budget Bill shall be a law immediately without further action by the Governor.]
(7) The Governor and such representatives of the executive departments, boards,
officers and commissions of the State expending or applying for State’s moneys, as have

SENATE BILL 1034
been designated by the Governor for this purpose, shall have the right, and when requested
by either House of the General Assembly, it shall be their duty to appear and be heard with
respect to any Budget Bill during the consideration thereof, and to answer inquiries relative
thereto.
(8) Supplementary Appropriation Bill. Either House may consider other
appropriations but both Houses shall not finally act upon such appropriations until after
the Budget Bill has been finally acted upon by both Houses, and no such other
appropriation shall be valid except in accordance with the provisions following: (a) Every
such appropriation shall be embodied in a separate bill limited to some single work, object
or purpose therein stated and called herein a Supplementary Appropriation Bill; (b) Each
Supplementary Appropriation Bill shall provide the revenue necessary to pay the
appropriation thereby made by a tax, direct or indirect, to be levied and collected as shall
be directed in said bill; (c) No Supplementary Appropriation Bill shall become a law unless
it be passed in each House by a vote of a majority of the whole number of the members
elected, and the yeas and nays recorded on its final passage; (d) Each Supplementary
Appropriation Bill shall be presented to the Governor of the State as provided in Section
17 of Article 2 of the Constitution and thereafter all the provisions of said section shall
apply.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the General Assembly
from passing at any time, in accordance with the provisions of Section 28 of Article 3 of the
Constitution and subject to the Governor’s power of approval as provided in Section 17 of
Article 2 of the Constitution, an appropriation bill to provide for the payment of any
obligation of the State within the protection of Section 10 of Article 1 of the Constitution of
the United States.
(10) If the Budget Bill shall not have been finally acted upon by the Legislature
seven days before the expiration of the regular session, the Governor shall issue a
proclamation extending the session for some further period as may, in the Governor’s
judgment, be necessary for the passage of such bill; but no matter other than such bill shall
be considered during such extended session except a provision for the cost thereof.
(11) For the purpose of making up the Budget, the Governor shall require from the
proper State officials (including all executive departments, all executive and administrative
offices, bureaus, boards, commissions and agencies that expend or supervise the
expenditure of, and all institutions applying, for State moneys and appropriations) such
itemized estimates and other information, in such form and at such times as directed by
the Governor. An estimate for a program required to be funded by a law which will be in
effect during the fiscal year covered by the Budget and which was enacted before July 1 of
the fiscal year prior to that date shall provide a level of funding not less than that prescribed
in the law. The estimates for the Legislative Department, certified by the presiding officer
of each House, of the Judiciary, as provided by law, certified by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court of Maryland, and for the public schools, as provided by law, shall be
transmitted to the Governor, in such form and at such times as directed by the Governor,
and shall be included in the Budget without revision.

SENATE BILL 1034 7
(12) The Governor may provide for public hearings on all estimates and may
require the attendance at such hearings of representatives of all agencies, and for all
institutions applying for State moneys. After such public hearings the Governor may, in
the Governor’s discretion, revise all estimates except those for the legislative and judiciary
departments, and for the public schools, as provided by law, and except that the Governor
may not reduce an estimate for a program below a level of funding prescribed by a law
which will be in effect during the fiscal year covered by the Budget, and which was enacted
before July 1 of the fiscal year prior thereto.
(13) The General Assembly may, from time to time, enact such laws not
inconsistent with this section, as may be necessary and proper to carry out its provisions.
(14) In the event of any inconsistency between any of the provisions of this Section
and any of the other provisions of the Constitution, the provisions of this Section shall
prevail. But nothing herein shall in any manner affect the provisions of Section 34 of Article
3 of the Constitution or of any laws heretofore or hereafter passed in pursuance thereof, or
be construed as preventing the Governor from calling extraordinary sessions of the General
Assembly, as provided by Section 16 of Article 2, or as preventing the General Assembly at
such extraordinary sessions from considering any emergency appropriation or
appropriations.
(15) If any item of any appropriation bill passed under the provisions of this
Section shall be held invalid upon any ground, such invalidity shall not affect the legality
of the bill or of any other item of such bill or bills.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.